Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
455

NATUROPATHIC
MEDICINE

Section

455-1 Definitions

455-1.5 Exceptions; scope of chapter

455-2 Licensing application and requirements;
fees

455-3 Education requirements

455-4 State board of naturopathic medicine

455-5 Repealed

455-6 Powers and authority of the board

455-7 Examination requirements

455-8 License to practice; biennial registration;
continuing

education

455-8.4 Public health emergency; temporary and
limited license

for licensed out-of-state naturopathic
physicians

455-8.5 Repealed

455-9 Penalty

455-10 Remedies or penalties cumulative

455-11 Discipline; grounds; proceedings; hearings

455-12 Repealed

Note

Chapter heading amended by L Sp 2009, c 22, §2.

Cross References

Filing of electronic mail address, see §451D-5.

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Health care professionals, see chapter 451D.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next